Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2602
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Optometry Practice Act and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-2603 to 38-2605 apply.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 874.